Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2133.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Right to Disconnect Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Emergency." An unforeseen situation that:(1) threatens an employee, customer or the public;(2) disrupts or shuts down operations; or(3) causes physical or environmental damage."Employer." The term shall include any of the following that employs 75 or more individuals, of which one individual is located in this Commonwealth:1234567891011121314151617 (1) Person, or an agent or officer of the person.(2) Firm, or an agent or officer of the firm.(3) Partnership, or an agent or officer of the partnership.(4) Association, or an agent or officer of the association.(5) Corporation, or an agent or officer of the corporation.(6) Receiver, or an agent or officer of the receiver.(7) Agent or officer of a court of this Commonwealth."Nonworking hours." Hours before or after an employee's assigned hours of work."Pattern of violation." Three or more documented instances of an employer violating section 3."Right to disconnect." Except as provided in section 3(b), an employee's right to ignore communications from the employee's employer during nonworking hours as established in accordance with section 3(b)(1).Section 3. Right to disconnect.(a) Workplace policy.--Each employer shall establish a workplace policy that provides employees the right to disconnect from communications from the employer during nonworking hours.(b) Nonworking hours.--(1) Nonworking hours shall be established by written agreement between an employer and employee.(2) An employer may contact an employee during nonworking hours to communicate scheduling changes within a 24-hour period or for an emergency.Section 4. Complaint.An employee may file a complaint with the Pennsylvania 20260HB2133PN2758 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Labor and Industry for a pattern of violations. If the complaint is appealed, the complaint may be referred to the Attorney General.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2133PN2758 - 3 - 12345